Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.210

Newspaper advertisements—Name and license number required—Penalty.

All newspaper advertising regarding auctions that is purchased by an auctioneer or an auction company licensed under this chapter shall include the auctioneer's or auction company's name and license number. Any auctioneer or auction company that violates this section is subject to an administrative fine of one hundred dollars per violation.

[ 1986 c 324 s 19; 1984 c 189 s 1.]